Maine, session 132, LD1127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §6410-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Liability. A receiver appointed by the commission pursuant to subsection 1 that
is acting in good faith while exercising the authorities granted pursuant to subsection 1
must be treated in the same manner as an employee acting on behalf of a governmental
entity under Title 14, chapter 741.
Page 1 - 132LR0553(03)